District of Columbia statutes.
9-401.04

Assessments for sidewalks and curbing.

When new sidewalks, alleys, or curbing are required to be laid on streets being improved, no cost shall be assessed against abutting property.

Aug. 7, 1894, 28 Stat. 250, ch. 232
May 21, 2002, D.C. Law 14-136, § 2, 49 DCR 3441
This section is referenced in § 9-411.03 and § 9-421.11.
1981 Ed., § 7-607.
1973 Ed., § 7-606.
D.C. Law 14-136 rewrote the section which had read as follows: “When new sidewalks or curbing are required to be laid on streets being improved, one-half the total cost shall be assessed against abutting property, in like manner and under the law governing in the case of assessment and permit work; provided, that abutting property shall not be liable to such assessment when sidewalk and curbing have been laid by the District authorities in front of the same under the assessment and permit system within 2 years prior to such assessment.”